Utah statutes.
11-40-101.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Applicant" means a person who seeks employment with a public water utility, either as an employee or as an independent contractor, and who, after employment, would, in the judgment of the public water utility, be in a position to affect the safety or security of the publicly owned treatment works or public water system or to affect the safety or well-being of patrons of the public water utility.

(2)  "Division" means the Criminal Investigation and Technical Services Division of the Department of Public Safety, established in Section 53-10-103.

(3)  "Independent contractor":

(a)  means an engineer, contractor, consultant, or supplier who designs, constructs, operates, maintains, repairs, replaces, or provides water treatment or conveyance facilities or equipment, or related control or security facilities or equipment, to the public water utility; and

(b)  includes the employees and agents of the engineer, contractor, consultant, or supplier.

(4)  "Person seeking access" means a person who seeks access to a public water utility's public water system or publicly owned treatment works and who, after obtaining access, would, in the judgment of the public water utility, be in a position to affect the safety or security of the publicly owned treatment works or public water system or to affect the safety or well-being of patrons of the public water utility.

(5)  "Publicly owned treatment works" has the same meaning as defined in Section 19-5-102.

(6)  "Public water system" has the same meaning as defined in Section 19-4-102.

(7)  "Public water utility" means a county, city, town, local district under Title 17B, Chapter 1, Provisions Applicable to All Local Districts, special service district under Title 17D, Chapter 1, Special Service District Act, or other political subdivision of the state that operates publicly owned treatment works or a public water system.



Amended by Chapter 360, 2008 General Session

